Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-375
Annulments; persons under disability; who may bring action; denial, when.

Annulment actions on behalf of persons under disability may be brought by a parent or adult next friend. An annulment may not be decreed if the marriage is found to be voidable and the parties freely cohabited after the ground for annulment has terminated or become known to the innocent party.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 29.